Mississippi statutes. Title 19. Counties and County Officers
Special Tax Levies

§ 19-9-91.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws of 1985, ch. 407, eff from and after March 25, 1985.

[Codes, 1942, § 2926.5; Laws, 1958, ch. 219, §§ 1, 2]

§ 19-9-93.
Financing the erection, remodeling, enlargement, or repair of county buildings.

The board of supervisors of any county may set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund for the erection, remodeling, enlarging, or repairing of the courthouse, jail or other county buildings.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 51, art 11 (1); 1857, ch. 59, art 22; 1871, § 1369; 1880, § 2150; 1892, § 305; 1906, § 324; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3697; 1930, § 231; 1942, § 2907; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 9, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 19-9-95.
Defrayal of expenses of courts of certain coast counties.

The board of supervisors of any county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico and having an assessed valuation of less than Five Million Dollars ($5,000,000.00), is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund for the purpose of defraying the expenses of the courts of the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2910; Laws, 1940, ch. 266; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 10, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 19-9-96.
Funding operation of youth court division.

The board of supervisors of any county may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund to be used for funding of the operation of the youth court division other than a municipal youth court division. Such funds shall be expended for no other purpose than:

Payment of the salaries of the referees, court administrators, youth court prosecutor when court appointed, youth court public defender, court reporters other than regular chancery court or county court reporters, clinical psychologists and other professional personnel, secretaries and other clerical or other court-appointed personnel, detention home employees, shelter home employees, halfway house employees and youth counsellors;

Travel and training expenses;

The operation of a youth court and related facilities, detention facilities, shelter home facilities, group homes and halfway houses;

Volunteer programs or other court-authorized programs;

Providing the youth court referee with a current set of the Mississippi Code of 1972 if a set has not been provided.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1980, ch. 550, § 29; Laws, 1985, ch. 536, § 5; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 11, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 19-9-97.
Funding for certain matters of public health.

The boards of supervisors of the various counties in the state are hereby authorized, in their discretion, to set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund for treatment of the indigent sick, for the promotion of public health of the county, and for the support and maintenance of a full-time county health department. The boards of supervisors are further authorized, in their discretion, to appropriate and transfer moneys from the general fund to any state agency, department or institution for the purpose of providing health care services or having such services provided to indigent persons of the county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2996; Laws, 1938, ch. 315; Laws, 1940, ch. 272; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 12; Laws, 1992, ch. 487 § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 8, 1992).

§ 19-9-99.
Securing funds for eradication of fire ants.

The board of supervisors of any county of the state may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund for the purpose of securing funds with which to cooperate with the Commissioner of Agriculture and Commerce in eradicating fire ants, as authorized by Section 69-25-33.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2986.5; Laws, 1964, ch. 285, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1968, ch. 294; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 13, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 19-9-101.
Securing funds for maintenance of fair associations.

The board of supervisors of any county in the State of Mississippi may, in its discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund for the purpose of securing funds with which to maintain fair associations, including the upkeep, repairs and payment of the necessary prizes and awards of said associations.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2985.5; Laws, 1960, ch. 172, §§ 1-3; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 14, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 19-9-103.
Funds for advertisement of economic opportunities in certain counties.

The boards of supervisors of all counties in the State of Mississippi situated wholly or partially in a levee district may, within their discretion, set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund for the purpose of deriving funds for advertising and bringing into favorable notice the opportunities, possibilities and resources of such counties.

The boards of supervisors of such counties may in their discretion cooperate with and appropriate funds to the Delta Council for advertising purposes as herein provided.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2980; Laws, 1940, ch. 321; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 15, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 19-9-105.
Funds for making soil survey maps and land classifications and reports thereof.

The board of supervisors of any county in the State of Mississippi is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund in cooperating with the Mississippi State Experiment Station and the Department of Agriculture of the United States of America in having made soil survey maps and land classifications and reports thereof.

The funds set aside for said purpose shall be appropriated by the board of supervisors upon the presentation and allowance of itemized bills therefor, as provided by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2911; Laws, 1940, ch. 267; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 16, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 19-9-107.
Funds for support of industrial and economic development programs in certain counties.

In any Class 5 county having an area between five hundred eighty (580) and six hundred fifteen (615) square miles and having a population between twenty-one thousand, six hundred eighty-one (21,681) and twenty-two thousand, six hundred eighty-one (22,681) according to the 1950 decennial census, and traversed by U.S. Highway No. 80 and in which is located a state park or junior college, and in any Class 6 county having an area between five hundred seventy-five (575) and six hundred seventy-five (675) square miles and having a population between twenty-one thousand (21,000) and twenty-two thousand (22,000) according to the 1950 decennial census, and traversed by the Natchez Trace, and in any Class 7 county having an area in excess of six hundred forty (640) square miles and a population between sixteen thousand (16,000) and seventeen thousand (17,000) according to the 1950 decennial census, and wherein there are located producing oil or gas wells, and in any Class 1 county in which there is located a state-supported college for women and a U.S. Air Force Base, the boards of supervisors are hereby authorized and empowered, in their discretion, to set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund which shall be used for the industrial and economic development programs of said counties through donations to industrial development corporations, and to maintain and support the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2911.5; Laws, 1960, ch. 194; Laws, 1964, ch. 289; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 17, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 19-9-109.
Levy of ad valorem tax for purchase, operation and maintenance of fire trucks and other fire fighting equipment.

In order to fund such expenditures as may arise pursuant to the authority granted by Section 19-5-97 to boards of supervisors of any county to purchase, operate, and maintain fire trucks and other fire fighting equipment, such boards of supervisors are empowered to levy an annual ad valorem tax not to exceed one-fourth (1/4) of one mill in such supervisors districts as participate in the provisions of Section 19-5-97. However, such tax shall not be levied upon any of the taxable property of the county or districts thereof lying in a municipality which furnishes fire protection within its corporate limits. No part of such additional levy shall be reimbursable under Sections 27-33-1 through 27-33-65, Mississippi Code of 1972.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2912.3; Laws, 1968, ch. 283, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 21, 1968).

§ 19-9-111.
Levy of tax for purpose of financing economic development districts.

The board of supervisors of any county authorized to establish or cooperate in the establishment of economic development districts pursuant to Section 19-5-99 may, in its discretion, levy a tax of not more than two (2) mills against the taxable property in the county or the portion thereof comprising an economic development district, to be used to support and maintain such district. The levy so made shall be in addition to all other levies provided by law.

Before any such levy is made, the board of supervisors shall signify its intention to make such a levy and publish same in a newspaper published in said county for thirty (30) days prior to making said levy. In the event more than twenty percent (20%) or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is less, of the qualified electors of said economic development district protest in writing to the board of supervisors against the imposition of such tax levy within thirty (30) days from the date such notice is published, then such proposed tax levy shall not be made unless same is approved by a special election called for said purpose. Said special election shall be conducted and had as provided by law.

The governing authorities of any municipality in a county, which has established an economic development district or which is included in an economic development district, may contribute to the support of such economic development district from its general fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2911.3; Laws, 1960, ch. 187.5; Laws, 1962, ch. 254 §§ 1-5; Laws, 1985, ch. 441, § 2, eff from and after October 1, 1985.

§ 19-9-113.
Funds for support of soil and water conservation district.

The board of supervisors of any county in the State of Mississippi, in its discretion, is hereby authorized to set aside, appropriate and expend moneys from the general fund for the support of the county’s soil and water conservation district.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2986.3; Laws, 1971, ch. 485, §§ 1, 2; Laws, 1974, ch. 489; Laws, 1986, ch. 400, § 18, eff from and after October 1, 1986.

§ 19-9-114.
Levy of tax for construction of vocational and technical educational center.

The board of supervisors of any county bordering on the Gulf of Mexico having a population according to the 1970 census of 134,582 persons, and having two cities located therein each having a population of over 30,000 persons according to the 1970 census, and in which is located a deep water port of entry and two military establishments located therein, is hereby authorized and empowered, in its discretion, to levy an additional ad valorem tax not to exceed one (1) mill to provide funds for the construction of a facility to house a county-wide vocational and technical educational center. Such additional levy may be in excess of and in addition to the rate of taxation otherwise limited by law.

The tax herein authorized shall not be levied until the board of supervisors shall have published notice of its intention to levy same. Said notice shall be published once each week for three (3) weeks in some newspaper having a general circulation in such county, but not less than twenty-one (21) days, nor more than sixty (60) days, intervening between the time of the first notice and the meeting at which said board proposes to levy such tax. If, within the time of giving notice, twenty percent (20%) or fifteen hundred (1500), whichever is less, of the qualified electors of the county shall protest or file a petition against the levy of such tax, then such tax shall not be levied unless authorized by a three-fifths (3/5) majority of the qualified electors of such county voting at an election to be called and held for that purpose.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 6495.5; Laws, 1972, ch. 517, §§ 1, 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 22, 1972).

§ 19-9-115.
Bond for special tax.

When any special tax may be levied for county purposes, the board of supervisors may require the tax collector to give an additional bond for the faithful collection and payment of the same.

HISTORY:
Codes, Hutchinson’s 1848, ch. 51, art 11 (3); 1857, ch. 59, art 28; 1871, § 1376; 1880, § 2157; 1892, § 316; 1906, § 337; Hemingway’s 1917, § 3710; 1930, § 232; 1942, § 2908.

§ 19-9-117.
Tax levy in second judicial district of Harrison County; issuance and sale of bonds.

The board of supervisors of Harrison County shall have the power and it shall be its duty to levy upon the property of the second judicial district whatever taxes may be required to meet the expenditures called for and required by the construction of the courthouse and offices and in order to secure funds for the procuring of and the erection, construction or alteration of any required building or buildings, the lands on which the same shall be, be erected, constructed, added to or altered, and any other expenditures authorized and required by law, including furnishing and equipping of said courthouse and offices. Said board shall have the power to borrow money by issuing and selling the bonds of the second district to an amount not exceeding the sum of Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) for the aforesaid purposes as set out in this section. Said bonds shall be issued in the same manner as provided in Sections 19-9-1 through 19-9-31.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 2910-22; Laws, 1962, ch. 257, § 22, eff from and after passage (approved June 1, 1962).